California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 bank or trust company, selected, shall have a total paid-in capital of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000). The general manager shall take from the trust department or trust company a receipt for the securities, and neither the general manager nor the district is responsible for the custody and safe return of the securities until they are withdrawn from the trust department or trust company by the general manager. Any trust department or trust company to which securities are delivered, either as agent or depository for the general manager, shall make such deposition of the securities as the general manager directs and is responsible only for strict compliance with written instructions given to it by the general manager. All such securities are at times subject to the order of the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98149.

The board may appoint a regular attorney who shall serve at the pleasure of the board or it may engage an attorney from time to time as the need arises. If they declare themselves available, the county counsel or the attorneys for any of the cities within the district shall be eligible to provide legal advice to the board at a reasonable rate of compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Labor Provisions [98160. - 98174.]

98160.

For purpose of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “District” means the Santa Cruz Metropolitan Transit District, including all operations and extensions of its transportation system, regardless of modality or vehicle type.

(b) “Employee organization” means an organization that includes employees of the district and a primary purpose of which is representing those employees in their relations with the district. “Employee organization” also includes any person of an employee organization authorized to act on its behalf.

(c) “Exclusive representative” means an accredited employee organization recognized or certified as the
 exclusive negotiating representative of employees in an appropriate unit within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 240, Sec. 2.   (SB 957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

98160.5.

(a) It is a primary purpose of this chapter to promote the improvement of personnel management and employer-employee relations within the district by providing a uniform basis for recognizing the right of employees to join employee organizations of their own choice, to be represented, to select one employee organization as the exclusive representative of the employees in an appropriate unit, and to afford employees a voice at work.

(b) The Public Employment Relations Board established pursuant to Section 3541 of the Government Code, and the powers and duties of that board, as described in Section 3541.3 of the Government Code, shall have jurisdiction, as appropriate, to enforce this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 240, Sec. 3.   (SB 957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

98160.7.

Appointments and promotions in the service of the transit district shall be made according to merit and fitness, to be ascertained, in so far as is practicable, by competitive examination.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 98160 by Stats. 2022, Ch. 240, Sec. 1.   (SB 957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

98161.

(a) All individuals shall have equal opportunity to obtain and hold employment, and to advance in that employment, without discrimination on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(b) An employee shall not be subject to punitive action, denied promotion, or threatened with that treatment for the exercise of lawful action as an elected, appointed, or recognized representative of an employee bargaining unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 240, Sec. 4.   (SB 957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

98162.

(a) All employees of the district are to be free from interference, coercion, and restraint in associating themselves together for their mutual benefit in connection with their employment. They may designate representatives of their own choosing and, collectively or individually, may exercise their right of petition to the board concerning wages, hours, or other conditions of employment.

(b) Employees have the right to self-organization; to form, join, or assist labor organizations; and to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing for the
 purpose of collective bargaining.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 368, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

98162.5.

(a) Any question that may arise with respect to whether a majority of the employees in an appropriate unit desire to be represented by a labor organization shall be submitted to the director of the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service, a division within the Public Employment Relations Board.

(b) In resolving the questions of representation, including the determination of the appropriate unit or units, petitions, and the conduct of hearings and elections, the director shall apply the relevant federal law and administrative practice developed under the Labor Management Relations Act, 1947 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 141 et seq.), as amended, and for this purpose shall adopt appropriate rules and regulations. The rules and regulations shall be administered by the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service and shall provide for a prompt public hearing
 and a secret ballot election to determine the question of representation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 240, Sec. 5.   (SB 957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

98163.

Whenever any district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility either in proceedings by eminent domain or otherwise, to the extent necessary for operation of facilities, all of the employees of such public utility whose duties pertain to the facilities acquired who have been employed by said utility for at least seventy-five (75) days shall be appointed to comparable positions in the district without examination and shall be governed thereafter by the personnel system adopted by the board, and these employees shall be given sick leave, seniority, and vacation credits in accordance with the records of the acquired public utility.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to those officers or supervisory employees of the acquired utility as shall be designated by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98164.

Whenever any district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility, either in proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, that has a pension plan in operation, members and beneficiaries of such pension plan shall continue to have the rights, privileges, benefits, obligations and status with respect to such established system.

Whenever any such facilities are acquired by the district, the board shall consider and take into account the outstanding obligations and liabilities of the publicly or privately owned public utility by reason of such pension plan and shall negotiate an allowance in the
 purchase price of such utility for the assumption of such obligations and liabilities when acquiring the facilities.

The persons entitled to pension benefits as provided for in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 98180) of this part and the benefits which are provided shall be specified in the agreement or order by which any public utility is acquired by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98165.

All persons receiving pension benefits from such acquired public utility and all persons entitled to pension benefits under the pension plan of such acquired public utility may become members or receive pensions under the retirement system established by the district by mutual agreement of such persons and the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98166.

(a) Notwithstanding the Government Code, the board may authorize payment of any or all of the premiums on any group life, accident and health insurance, health and welfare plan, or pension or retirement plan on officers or employees of the district.

(b) Upon authorization by its employees, the district may make deductions from the wages and salaries of its employees:

(1) For the payment of contributions pursuant to any health and welfare, pension, or retirement plan.

(2) For any purpose for which deductions may be authorized by employees of any private employer.

(3) For the payment of union dues, fees, assessments, and voluntary political contributions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 240, Sec. 6.   (SB 957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

98167.

(a) The obligation of the district is to bargain in good faith with a duly designated or certified labor organization and, when an agreement is reached, to execute a written collective bargaining agreement with the labor organization covering the wages, hours, and working conditions of the employees represented by the labor organization in an appropriate unit, and, thereafter, to comply with the terms of the agreement.

(b) The obligation of the district to bargain collectively extends to all subjects of collective bargaining concerning wages, hours, working conditions, and other conditions of employment.

(c) This section supersedes Chapter 10 (commencing
 with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code if there is any conflict between this section and that chapter, but in all other situations that chapter governs.

(d) The district shall give reasonable written notice to an exclusive representative of its intent to make any change to matters within the scope of representation of the employees represented by the exclusive representative for purposes of providing the exclusive representative a reasonable amount of time to negotiate with the district regarding the proposed changes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 240, Sec. 7.   (SB 957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

98168.

(a) The district shall not require any employee, who is a member of a bona fide religion, body, or sect which has historically held conscientious objections to joining or financially supporting labor organizations, to join or financially support any public employee labor organization as a condition of employment. However, that employee may be required, in lieu of paying periodic dues, fees, or assessments to a labor organization, to pay sums equal to those dues, fees, or assessments to a nonreligious, nonlabor charitable fund exempt from taxation under Section 501(c) (3) of the
 Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c) (3)), chosen by the employee from a list of at least three qualifying funds, designated in a memorandum of understanding between the district and the labor organization or, if the memorandum of understanding fails to designate the funds, then to any qualifying fund chosen by the employee. Proof of payments made pursuant to this section shall be made on a monthly basis to the district as a condition of continued exemption from the requirement of financial support to a labor organization.

(b) An exclusive representative may represent their bargaining unit members in employer-employee relations with the district, and employees shall have the right to be represented by their exclusive representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 240, Sec. 8.   (SB 957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

98169.

It is unlawful for the district to do any of the following:

(a) Impose or threaten to impose reprisals on employees, to discriminate or threaten to discriminate against employees, or otherwise to interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees because of their exercise of rights guaranteed to them by this chapter. As used in this subdivision, “employee” includes an applicant for employment or reemployment with the district.

(b) Deny employee organizations rights guaranteed to them by this chapter.

(c) Refuse or fail to meet and negotiate in good faith with an exclusive representative. Knowingly providing an exclusive representative with
 inaccurate information, whether or not it is in response to a request for information, constitutes a refusal or failure of the district to meet and negotiate in good faith with the exclusive representative.

(d) Dominate or interfere with the formation or administration of any employee organization, or contribute financial or other support to it, or in any way encourage employees to join any employee organization in preference to another.

(e) Refuse to participate in good faith in mutually agreed upon impasse procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 240, Sec. 9.   (SB 957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

98170.

It is unlawful for an employee organization to do any of the following:

(a) Impose or threaten to impose reprisals on employees, discriminate or threaten to discriminate against employees, or otherwise interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees because of their exercise of rights guaranteed to them by this chapter.

(b) Refuse or fail to meet and negotiate in good faith with the district concerning any of the employees of which it is the exclusive representative.

(c) Refuse to participate in good faith in mutually agreed upon impasse procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 240, Sec. 10.   (SB 957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

98171.

(a) This chapter shall not displace, or supplant, the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3610) of Division 4.5 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and the impasse resolution and injunctive relief procedures provided for pursuant to Sections 3612 to 3614, inclusive, of the Government Code shall remain exclusive.

(b) The initial determination as to whether the charge of unfair practice is justified and, if so, the appropriate remedy necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, is a matter within the exclusive jurisdiction of the Public Employment Relations Board, except that in an action to recover damages due to an unlawful strike, the Public Employment Relations Board shall not award strike-preparation expenses as
 damages, and shall not award damages for costs, expenses, or revenue losses incurred during, or as a consequence of, an unlawful strike.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 240, Sec. 11.   (SB 957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

98172.

(a) Any charging party, respondent, or intervenor aggrieved by a final decision or order of the Public Employment Relations Board in an unfair practice case, except a decision of that board not to issue a complaint in such a case, may petition for a writ of extraordinary relief from that decision or order.

(b) A petition for a writ of extraordinary relief shall be filed in the district court of appeal having jurisdiction over any county in which the district operates. The petition shall be filed within 30 days from the date of the issuance of the Public Employment Relations Board’s final decision or order, or order denying reconsideration, as applicable. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall cause notice to be served on the Public
 Employment Relations Board and thereafter shall have jurisdiction of the proceeding. The Public Employment Relations Board shall file in the court the record of the proceeding, certified by that board, within 10 days after the clerk’s notice unless that time is extended by the court for good cause shown. The court shall have jurisdiction to grant any temporary relief or restraining order it deems just and proper, and in like manner to make and enter a decree enforcing, modifying, and enforcing as modified, or setting aside in whole or in part the decision or order of the Public Employment Relations Board. The findings of the Public Employment Relations Board with respect to questions of fact, including ultimate facts, if supported by substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole, shall be conclusive. Title 1 (commencing with Section 1067) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to writs shall, except where specifically superseded by this section, apply to proceedings pursuant to this
 section.

(c) If the time to petition for extraordinary relief from a Public Employment Relations Board decision or order has expired, the Public Employment Relations Board may seek enforcement of any final decision or order in a district court of appeal or superior court having jurisdiction over the county where the events giving rise to the decision or order occurred. The Public Employment Relations Board shall respond within 10 days to any inquiry from a party to the action as to why the Public Employment Relations Board has not sought court enforcement of the final decision or order. If the response does not indicate that there has been compliance with the Public Employment Relations Board’s final decision or order, the Public Employment Relations Board shall seek enforcement of the final decision or order upon the request of the party. The Public Employment Relations Board shall file in the court the record of the proceeding, certified by
 that board, and appropriate evidence disclosing the failure to comply with the decision or order. If, after hearing, the court determines that the order was issued pursuant to the procedures established by the Public Employment Relations Board and that the person or entity refuses to comply with the order, the court shall enforce the order by writ of mandamus or other proper process. The court may not review the merits of the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 240, Sec. 12.   (SB 957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

98173.

This chapter, as amended by the act adding this section, shall not be interpreted as if it were in conflict with any collective bargaining agreement and shall not be implemented to abrogate an agreement entered into between the district and an employee organization before January 1, 2023. This chapter shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with the Public Employment Relations Board’s interpretation of parallel provisions in other statutes it enforces.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 240, Sec. 13.   (SB 957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

98174.

Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 3555) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code applies to the district and its employees. Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (I) of Section 3558.8 of the Government Code, the district is a public employer for purposes of Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 3555) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 240, Sec. 14.   (SB 957)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Retirement System [98180. - 98205.]



  ARTICLE 1. Establishment [98180. - 98185.]

98180.

The board may establish a retirement system for the officers and employees of the district and provide for the payment of annuities, pensions, retirement allowances, disability payments, and death benefits or any of them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98181.

The district may maintain its own retirement fund or may provide for benefits to eligible officers and employees, or their beneficiaries, by means of group insurance, or other insurance, or by such means as in the opinion of the board will satisfactorily provide an adequate and sure method of meeting the payments contemplated by the retirement system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98182.

Before establishing any retirement system the board shall secure a report from a qualified actuary, which shall show the cost of the benefits provided by the system, and the prospective assets and liabilities of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98183.

The board may adopt all ordinances and resolutions and perform all acts necessary or convenient to the initiation, maintenance, and administrations of the retirement system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98184.

Nothing in this chapter prevents the district from participation in and making all or part of its employees members of the State Employees’ Retirement System by contract entered into between the district and the board of administration of the system under the State Employees’ Retirement Law or from participating in the Federal Social Security Act pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 22000), Division 5, Title 2 of the Government Code, and the district may perform all acts necessary or convenient for such participation. Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the district from participating in and making all of its employees members of the Santa Cruz County Employees’
 Retirement System.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98185.

The board may classify and determine the officers and employees who shall be included as members in the retirement system and may change the classification from time to time. Membership of all officers and employees so classified and included in the retirement system is compulsory. The retirement system shall not apply to members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Benefits and Contributions [98190. - 98196.]

98190.

The board may prescribe the terms and conditions upon which the officers and employees of the district or their beneficiaries shall be entitled to benefits and the amounts thereof provided, that said board shall have no such authority respecting the County Employees’ Retirement Act of 1937.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98191.

The retirement allowance may be predicated in part upon service rendered the district by a member prior to the establishment of the retirement system, which service is known as “prior service”.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98192.

The board shall provide that both the district and the members shall contribute to the retirement system. The rate of contribution by an officer or employee of the district becoming a member of the retirement system shall be so fixed as to provide, with accumulated interest and based on tables and assumptions adopted by the board, substantially one-half the value of any retirement allowance granted for service, exclusive of any credits allowed for prior service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98193.

All members of the retirement system shall contribute in the manner and amount fixed by the board and such contributions may be collected by deducting the amounts thereof from the salary, wages or compensation due such members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98194.

Liabilities accruing under the retirement system because of benefits other than such as are the equivalent of contributions by the members, with accumulated interests, shall be met by contributions by the district. Prior service or other liabilities of the district may be met by annual appropriation instead of by one appropriation for the total of the liabilities; but until the present value of regular contributions for current service, together with assets then available, equals the present value of all allowances and benefits granted or to be granted under the system, the appropriation for any one year when added to any unused balance of any previous appropriations for
 such purpose shall not be less than the amount disbursed during that year on account of prior service or other liabilities of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98195.

If any member withdraws from the retirement system prior to retirement the total amount contributed by him with such interest as may be credited thereto, shall be returned to him, provided, however, that the board may prescribe the terms and conditions upon which a member, whose district service has been terminated except by death or retirement, may elect to leave his contributions and interest thereon in the retirement fund, and the terms and conditions upon which a retirement allowance may be made to him after such termination based upon his contributions prior to such termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98196.

All money received by any person as an annuity, pension, retirement, allowance, disability payment or death benefit, from the retirement system, and all contributions and interest thereon returned to any member of the retirement system, whether in the actual possession of such member or deposited, loaned, or invested by him, is exempt from execution or any other process except to the extent permitted by Section 704.110 of the Code of Civil Procedure and is unassignable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 169.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Retirement Board [98200. - 98203.]

98200.

The board may create a retirement board of not more than five members, at least two members of which shall be the elected representatives of the employees, to administer the retirement system, and shall define its powers and duties and the tenure of the members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98201.

All members of the retirement board shall serve without pay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98202.

The retirement board shall determine the eligibility of officers, employees, and their dependents to participation in the system and shall be the sole authority and judge under such ordinances as may be adopted by the board as to the conditions under which persons may be admitted to and continue to receive benefits of any sort under the retirement system, and may modify allowances for service and disability. The determination of the retirement board shall be final and conclusive and shall not be modified or set aside except for fraud or abuse of discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98203.

If the district maintains its own retirement fund the retirement board shall have exclusive control of the administration, investment, and disbursement of such fund. Investment of the fund shall be subject to the terms, conditions, limitations, and restrictions imposed by the laws of this state upon savings banks in the making of investments by savings banks, and cash may be deposited in any licensed national bank or banks in this state or in any bank, banks, or corporations authorized or licensed to do a banking business and organized under the laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Investigation and Penalties [98204. - 98205.]

98204.

At least once in each four-year period after the establishment of the retirement system the board shall cause to be made an actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the retirement fund and upon the basis of such investigation and valuation shall make such revision or change of the rate of contribution, the periods and conditions of service, and amounts of retirement allowances as may be necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98205.

Except as herein provided, no member of the board or of the retirement board, nor any member of the retirement system or employee of the district, shall have any interest direct or indirect in the making of any investment or in the gains or profits accruing therefrom, and no such person, directly or indirectly, for himself or as an agent or partner of others shall borrow any of its funds, nor shall any such person in any manner use the same except to make such current and necessary payments as are authorized by the retirement board, nor shall such a person become an endorser or surety as to, or in any manner an obligor for investments of the retirement
 fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Powers and Functions of District [98210. - 98296.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Power [98210. - 98214.]

98210.

The district has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at its pleasure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98211.

The district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98212.

The district may exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary or convenient to the exercise of the powers granted in this part. The district, in exercising such power, in addition to the damage for the taking, injury, or destruction of property, shall also pay the cost of removal, reconstruction, or relocation of any structure, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, cables, or poles of any public utility or public district which is required to be moved to a new location.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1176.)
-------------------------------------------

98213.

No action in eminent domain to acquire property or interests therein within any incorporated city or any county shall be commenced unless the legislative body of the affected city or county has consented to such acquisition by resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98214.

No such taking or acquisition by the district which would involve the abandonment, removal, relocation, or use of property of a railroad corporation, as defined in Section 230 of this code, shall be permitted, unless the Public Utilities Commission, after hearing, shall find and determine that the public interest and necessity require the abandonment, removal, relocation, or use of such property and that such taking or acquisition will not unreasonably impair the ability of the railroad corporation involved to provide safe, adequate, economical, and efficient service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [98220. - 98221.]

98220.

The district may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and hold harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98221.

No officer or employee of the district shall in any manner be interested directly or indirectly, in any contract awarded or to be awarded by the board, or in the profits to be derived therefrom contrary to the provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090), Chapter 1, Division 4, Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Property [98233. - 98234.]

98233.

The district may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise or lease, or condemn in proceedings under eminent domain, or otherwise acquire, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without the district necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The board may lease, sell, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property within or without the district when in its judgment it is for the best interests of the district so to do.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98234.

Whenever the board by resolution determines that any record, map, book, or paper in the possession of the district or any officer or employee thereof is of no further value to the district, the board may authorize its sale, destruction, or other disposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transit Facilities and Service [98240. - 98251.]

98240.

The district may acquire, construct, own, operate, control or use rights-of-way, rail lines, buslines, stations, platforms, switches, yards, terminals, and any and all other facilities necessary or convenient for transit service within or partly without the district, underground, upon, or above the ground and under, upon, or over public streets or other public ways or waterways, together with all physical structures necessary or convenient for the access of persons and vehicles thereto, and may acquire any interest in or rights to the joint use of any or all of the foregoing; provided, that installations in any street, road or other property devoted to a public use shall
 be subject to consent of the governing body in charge of such public use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98241.

The district may without limitation by any other provisions of this part requiring approval of indebtedness, accept contributions of money, rights-of-way, labor, materials, and any other property for the acquisition, construction, maintenance and operation of transit facilities, and may without limitations by any other provisions of this part enter into any contracts and cooperation with and accept cooperation from the state, or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, or any public agency in the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, and in financing the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of, any such transit
 facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98242.

The district shall not interfere with or exercise any control over any transit facilities now or hereafter owned, and operated wholly or partly within the district by any city or public agency, unless by consent of such city or public agency and upon such terms as are mutually agreed upon between the board and such city or public agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98243.

The district may lease or contract for the use of its transit facilities or any portion thereof, to any operator, and may provide for subleases by such operator upon such terms and conditions as it deems in the public interest. The word “operator” as used in this section means any city or public agency or any person, firm or private corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98244.

The district may construct and operate or acquire and operate works and facilities in, under, upon, over, across, or along any street or public highway or any stream, bay or watercourse, or over any of the lands which are the property of the state, to the same extent that such rights and privileges appertaining thereto are granted to municipalities within the state, and to install adequate bus stops, including the painting of curbs, subject to the consent of the governing body in charge of such streets, highways, stream, watercourse, or lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98245.

The district may enter into agreements for the joint use of any property and rights by the district and any city, public agency or public utility operating transit facilities; may enter into agreements with any city, public agency or public utility operating any transit facilities, either wholly or partially within, or without, the district, for the joint use of any property of the district or of such city, public agency or public utility, or the establishment of through routes, joint fares, transfer of passengers or pooling arrangements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98246.

The rates and charges for service furnished pursuant to this part shall be fixed by the board and shall be reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98247.

The board of supervisors or the city council of a municipality having territory located within the district may file a request for a hearing before the district board as to the reasonableness of any rates or charges fixed by the district and as to any proposal for fixing the location of facilities by the district. The request shall be in writing and shall state the subject matter on which a hearing is desired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98248.

Upon the filing of a request for hearing as provided in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 98390) of this part, the district board shall fix the time and place for hearing. The time fixed shall not be less than 15 days nor more than 60 days from the date such request is filed. Notice of such hearing shall be given to the county or city requesting such hearing and shall be published by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98249.

At the time fixed for any hearing before the board any board of supervisors or city council eligible to file a request for hearing, not a party to the original request for hearing, may intervene and shall be entitled to be heard and to introduce evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98250.

Within 30 days after submission of the case, the board shall render its decision and its decision shall be final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------

98251.

The district shall be subject to the provisions of Division 14.8 (commencing with Section 34500) of the Vehicle Code with respect to the operation of buses and to the rules and regulations prescribed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol pursuant to that chapter regulating the safe operation of buses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 978.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Indebtedness [98260. - 98263.]

98260.
